Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Education shall conduct  an audit of the assessments
administered to kindergarteners in the public schools of this state.  The department shall
submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations
for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to education
no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 302 (SB 302-A) Page 1